Utah, session 2026, HB49.
Section 1. Section 63A-17-110 is amended to read:63A-17-110. State pay plans for DNR law enforcement officers and wildland firefighters.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands" means the division created in Section 65A-1-4 within the Department of Natural Resources.(b)"Division of Law Enforcement" means the division created in Section 79-2-702 within the Department of Natural Resources.(c)"DNR law enforcement officer" means an employee of the Department of Natural Resources who is designated as a law enforcement officer by law.(d)"State average law enforcement salary range and progression" means the sum of the following, divided by two:(i)the salary range and proposed pay progression for a peace officer with similar years of service and qualifications who is employed by the Department of Corrections and has arrest authority; and(ii)the salary range and proposed pay progression for a peace officer with similar years of service and qualifications who is employed by the Department of Public Safety.(d)(e)"Wildland firefighter" means an employee of the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands who is:(i)trained in firefighter techniques; and(ii)assigned to a position of hazardous duty.(2)The director shall:(a)coordinate directly with the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands and the Division of Law Enforcement to establish specialized state pay plans for DNR law enforcement officers and wildland firefighters that:(i)meetsmeet the requirements of Section 63A-17-307;(ii)distinguishessubject to Subsection (3), establish the salary range and proposed pay progression for each DNR peacelaw enforcement officer;(iii)distinguishesestablish the salary range for each wildland firefighter classification;(iv)includesinclude for each DNR law enforcement officer and wildland firefighter classification:(A)the minimum qualifications; and(B)any training requirements; and(v)providesprovide standards for:(A)performance evaluation; and(B)promotion; and(b)include, in the plan described in Subsection 63A-17-307(5), recommendations on funding and salary increases for DNR law enforcement officers and wildland firefighters.(3)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), the salary range and proposed pay progression established for each DNR law enforcement officer under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) shall be equivalent to the state average law enforcement salary range and progression.(b)The executive director of the Department of Natural Resources, in consultation with the director of the Division of Law Enforcement, may reduce the salary range and proposed pay progression that would otherwise be established, under Subsections (2)(a)(ii) and (3)(a), for the rank of major or for division director within the Division of Law Enforcement, to ensure that the salary range and proposed pay progression for those positions do not exceed the salary range and proposed pay progression of directors of other divisions within the Department of Natural Resources.

Section 2:
Section 2.  FY 2027 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2027. Subsection 2(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.NATURAL RESOURCES, AGRICULTURE, AND ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITYDEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESITEM 1Department of Natural Resources - Law EnforcementFrom General Fund2,839,300Law Enforcement Administration2,839,300

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.